th: สีเรืองแสงของดินปั้น: สีฟ้า/สีไซแอน; สีน้ำเงิน; เปลี่ยนสีได้; สีเขียว; หลายสี; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
fi: Muovailumassan hohtoväri: Turkoosi/syaani; Sininen; Väriä vaihtava; Vihreä; Monivärinen; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
ko: 퍼티 발광 색상: 아쿠아/시안; 파란색; 색상 변환; 녹색; 멀티 컬러; 주황색; 분홍색; 보라색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
nl: Putty glow kleur: Aqua/Cyaan; Blauw; Kleurveranderend; Groen; Meerkleurig; Oranje; Roze; Paars; Rood; Wit; Geel; Overig
el: Χρώμα φωσφορισμού εύπλαστης μάζας: Γαλάζιο/Κυανό; Μπλε; Που αλλάζει χρώμα; Πράσινο; Πολύχρωμο; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Μοβ; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Plastilino švytėjimo spalva: Žydra / žalsvai mėlyna; Mėlyna; Keičianti spalvą; Žalia; Įvairiaspalvė; Oranžinė; Rausva; Violetinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
bg-BG: Цвят на светене на пластилина: Аква/циан; Син; Променящ цвета си; Зелен; Многоцветен; Оранжев; Розов; Лилав; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Друго
sk-SK: Farba žiarenia tmelu: Akvamarínová/azúrová; Modrá; Meniaca farbu; Zelená; Viacfarebná; Oranžová; Ružová; Fialová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iné
hr-HR: Boja sjaja kita: Akvamarin/cijan; Plava; Mijenja boju; Zelena; Višebojno; Narančasta; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
es: Color del brillo de la masilla: Agua/cian; Azul; Cambia de color; Verde; Multicolor; Naranja; Rosa; Morado; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
pl: Kolor świecenia putty: Morski / błękitny (cyjan); Niebieski; Zmieniający kolor; Zielony; Wielokolorowy; Pomarańczowy; Różowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inne
nb: Kittglødfarge: Akva/cyan; Blå; Fargeskiftende; Grønn; Flerfarget; Oransje; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
pt-BR: Massa cor do brilho: Água/Ciano; Azul; Muda de cor; Verde; Multicolorido; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outra
hu: Gyurma fénylő színe: Akvamarin/ciánkék; Kék; Színváltó; Zöld; Többszínű; Narancssárga; Rózsaszín; Lila; Piros; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
ja: パテのような光沢色: アクア/シアン; 青; カラーチェンジ; 緑; マルチカラー; オレンジ; ピンク; 紫; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他
da: Selvlysende puttys farve: Aqua/cyan; Blå; Farveskiftende; Grøn; Flerfarvet; Orange; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
sl-SI: Barva svetilnosti mase za oblikovanje: Akvamarin/cijan; Modra; Spreminjanje barve; Zelena; Večbarvno; Oranžna; Roza; Vijoličasta; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
fr: Couleur phosphorescente de la pâte: Aqua/cyan; Bleu; Changement de couleur; Vert; Multicolore; Orange; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
tr: Macun parıltı rengi: Su yeşili/Camgöbeği; Mavi; Renk değiştiren; Yeşil; Çok renkli; Turuncu; Pembe; Mor; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
it: Colore fosforescente: Acqua/ciano; Blu; Cangiante; Verde; Multicolore; Arancione; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
zh-TW: 發光黏土發光顏色: 水藍色/青色; 藍色; 變色; 綠色; 多色; 橙色; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
zh-CN: 橡皮泥发光颜色: 水绿色/青色; 蓝色; 变色; 绿色; 多色; 橙色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
vi: Màu phát sáng của bột trét: Xanh lơ/Lục lam; Màu xanh dương; Đổi màu; Màu xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu; Màu cam; Màu hồng; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
pt-PT: Cor do brilho da massa modelável: Azul-água/ciano; Azul; Muda de cor; Verde; Multicor; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outra
sv: Glödande kittets färg: Aqua/cyan; Blå; Färgskiftande; Grön; Flerfärgad; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
en: Putty glow color: Aqua/Cyan; Blue; Color-changing; Green; Multi-color; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; White; Yellow; Other
cs: Tmel zářivá barva: Akvamarínová / azurová; Modrá; Měnící barvu; Zelená; Vícebarevná; Oranžová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiná
ru: Цвет свечения пластилина: Аквамарин/циан; Синий; Меняющий цвет; Зеленый; Многоцветный; Оранжевый; Розовый; Пурпурный; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другое
de: Leuchtfarbe der Knete: Aqua/Cyan; Blau; Farbwechselnd; Grün; Mehrfarbig; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstige
ro-RO: Culoarea luminii emise de slime în modul de strălucire: Aqua/Cyan; Albastru; Își schimbă culoarea; Verde; Multicolor; Portocaliu; Roz; Mov; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele